Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding ORS 305.570 (1)(b), an association  or organization has
standing to seek declaratory relief in the Oregon Tax Court if:
(1) One or more members of the association or  organization is adversely affected or
aggrieved by the subject of the requested declaration;
(2) The interests that the association or organization seeks to protect are germane  to
the purpose of the association or organization; and
(3) The nature of the claim and the relief requested do  not require that the members of
the association or organization who are adversely affected or aggrieved  participate in the
proceedings in the Oregon Tax Court.
Passed by House April 7, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 21, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2119 (HB 2119-A) Page 1